Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding any  other provision of law, the allocation from the
Watershed Conservation Operating Fund established by section 3, chapter 659,  Oregon Laws
2015, for the biennium ending June 30, 2017, to be allocated  by the Oregon Watershed En-
hancement Board to the State Department of Agriculture, is increased by $1,101,380 for ac-
tivities and projects to implement Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  3, chapter 683, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium ending June 30,
2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the State Department of Agriculture
from lottery  moneys deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund established
under ORS 541.945, is increased by $1,101,380 for the eradication of invasive pests.
SECTION 2.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (1), chapter 691, Oregon Laws 2015, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2017, is decreased by $300,000 for judicial compensation.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Judicial Department by section 1  (3), chapter 691, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, is increased by $300,000 for mandated payments.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Judicial Department by section 1  (6), chapter 691, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, is increased by $2,340,000 for third-party debt collection.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2), chapter 615,  Oregon Laws
2015, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2017, is increased by $9,000,000 for professional ser-
vices.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (1), chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by  the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, for administrative
expenses, is increased by $800,000 for bank card fees.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5508 (SB 5508-A) Page 1
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 1 (2), chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2015, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor  Control Commission, is increased by
$3,200,000 for agents’ compensation.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 1, chapter 837, Oregon Laws 2015, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as modified by legislative or Emergency Board action, is decreased by
$28,258,206.
SECTION 7.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 305,  Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Public Utility Commission of Oregon, for the utility  pro-
gram, is increased by $102,774 for facilities rent.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  1 (2), chapter 305, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium ending June 30,
2017, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Public Utility Commission of Oregon, for the Residential Service Protection
Fund, is increased by $8,974 for facilities rent.
(3) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  1 (3), chapter 305, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium ending June 30,
2017, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Public Utility Commission  of Oregon, for administration, is increased by
$61,694 for facilities rent.
(4) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 2, chapter 305, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium ending  June 30,
2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received
by the Public Utility Commission of Oregon, is increased by $1,558 for facilities rent.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Land Use Board of Appeals by section  1, chapter 193, Oregon Laws 2015, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2017, is increased by $27,090 for administrative and security costs.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter 411, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2017, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and including federal grant funds received, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter 411, Oregon
Laws 2015, collected or received  by the Psychiatric Security Review Board, is increased by
$4,000 for training.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (1), chapter 809, Oregon Laws  2015, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2017, for fire protection,  is increased by $7,997,091 for the
payment of emergency forest fire costs.
SECTION 11. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (4), chapter  335, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the  Department of State Lands, for capital improvements, is
increased by $75,000 for sump pump repairs.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5508 (SB 5508-A) Page 2
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  1 (1), chapter 335, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium ending June 30,
2017, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or
received by the Department of State Lands, for Common School Fund programs,  is increased
by $1,380,000 for the Portland Harbor, Triangle Park Restoration Project.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (6), chapter 642, Oregon
Laws 2015, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2017, is increased by $3,125,000 for Oregon Op-
portunity Grants.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,253,415 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2017, as  the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission, for debt service on outstanding general  obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution for the benefit of Oregon public  uni-
versities.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter 657, Oregon Laws 2015,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2017, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from federal funds, other than
those described in section 2, chapter  657, Oregon Laws 2015, collected or received by the
State Department of  Geology and Mineral Industries, is increased by $81,409 for the 3D ele-
vation program grant.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Legislative Administration Committee by section 1 (1), chapter 772, Oregon Laws
2015, for the biennium ending June 30, 2017, is increased by $399,000  for security enhance-
ments at the State Capitol.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Legislative Assembly by  section 5 (1), chapter 772, Oregon Laws 2015, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2017, is decreased by $399,000.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 658, Oregon Laws 2015, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training, for
operations, is increased by $2,424,480 for public safety training classes.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3,  chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission, is increased by $875,000 for ex-
pending a grant award.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter 696, Oregon Laws  2015, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2017, is decreased by $2,300,000  for patrol services, criminal
investigations and gaming enforcement.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (2), chapter 696, Oregon Laws  2015, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2017, is decreased by $1,300,000 for fish and wildlife enforce-
ment.
SECTION 21.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (3), chapter 696, Oregon Laws  2015, for
Enrolled Senate Bill 5508 (SB 5508-A) Page 3
the biennium ending June 30, 2017, is decreased by $1,750,000  for forensic services and the
State Medical Examiner.
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police by  section 4, chapter 74, Oregon Laws 2016, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2017, is decreased  by $325,000 for establishing and operating a tip
line.
SECTION 23. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Department of State Police by section 1 (4), chapter 696, Oregon Laws 2015, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2017, is increased by $5,675,000 for  administrative services,
agency support, criminal justice information services and the office of the State Fire Mar-
shal.
SECTION 24.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 696, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received  by the Department of State Police is increased by $1,600,000 for
patrol services, criminal investigations and gaming enforcement.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 696, Oregon Laws 2015, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of State Police, is increased by $1,700,000 for
fish and wildlife enforcement.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 696, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of State Police, is increased by $600,000 for
forensic services and the State Medical Examiner.
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 696, Oregon Laws 2015, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of State Police, is  decreased by $3,900,000 for
administrative services, agency support, criminal  justice information services and the office
of the State Fire Marshal.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (1), chapter 696, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or  received by the Department of State Police, is increased by $550,000 for patrol
services, criminal investigations and gaming enforcement.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (2), chapter 696, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Department of  State Police, is decreased by $235,000 for fish and
wildlife enforcement.
SECTION 30. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (3), chapter 696, Oregon Laws 2015, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Department of  State Police, is decreased by $215,000 for forensic
services.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5508 (SB 5508-A) Page 4
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (4), chapter 696, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Department of State Police, is decreased  by $100,000 for admin-
istrative services, agency support, criminal justice  information services and the office of the
State Fire Marshal.
SECTION 32. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (1), chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2015, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2017, is increased  by $6,000,000 for operations and health ser-
vices.
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2015, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or  received by the Department of Corrections, is decreased by $4,000,000 for
administration, general services and human resources.
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department  of Corrections, is increased by $4,000,000 for
operations and health services.
SECTION 35. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2015, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for the Civil Enforcement Division,
is increased by  $4,406,264 for the Civil Enforcement Division and Cover Oregon litigation ex-
penses.
SECTION 36. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1, chapter 332, Oregon Laws 2015, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2017, is increased by $170,000 for paying the expenses of district
attorneys.
SECTION 37.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (2), chapter 596, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
596, Oregon Laws 2015, collected or received  by the Department of Revenue, is increased by
$3,021,004 for the  Property Tax Division and the County Assessment Function Funding As-
sistance Account.
SECTION 38.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 3, chapter 837, Oregon Laws  2015, for the
biennium ending June 30,  2017, is increased by $805,522 for the core system replacement
project and Oregon Department of Administrative Services charges.
SECTION 39. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter 596,  Oregon Laws 2015, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2017, is decreased  by $402,761 for the Personal Tax and Compliance
Division.
SECTION 40. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (4), chapter 596,  Oregon Laws 2015, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2017, is decreased by $281,933 for the Business Division.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5508 (SB 5508-A) Page 5
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (1), chapter 596,  Oregon Laws 2015, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2017, is decreased by $120,828 for administration.
SECTION 42. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $30 is
established for the biennium ending June 30, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of  ex-
penses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the Department of Revenue for debt
service for outstanding general obligation  bonds sold pursuant to Article XI-Q of the Oregon
Constitution, for the core system replacement  project in the debt service and related costs
program.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authorized  appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium  ending June 30, 2017, for the following agencies
and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2015
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Mill Creek Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 654 1(5) -$26,300
Go! Oregon Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 654 1(6) -58,828
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 837 86 -4,999,020
Department of Revenue:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 596 1(7) -853,940
Capital Debt Service and
Related Costs:
General Fund Ch. 837 8 -71,843
(2) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
2015
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business
Development Department:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 694 1(2) -$722,500
Lottery Bond Debt Service
Enrolled Senate Bill 5508 (SB 5508-A) Page 6
Lottery funds Ch. 694 3(4) -2,862,877
Other funds Ch. 694 2(5) +2,862,877
(3) EDUCATION.
2015
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-Q of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon public
universities
General Fund Ch. 642
1(16)(c) -$1,362,365
Debt service on outstanding
certificates of participation
sold for the benefit of Oregon
public universities
General Fund Ch. 642
1(16)(d) -94,146
(4) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
2015
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 772 1(2) -$5,280
(5) NATURAL RESOURCES.
2015
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled Senate Bill 5508 (SB 5508-A) Page 7
Department of Environmental
Quality:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 593 1(4) -$42,946
State Forestry Department:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 809 1(3) +576,504
(6) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2015
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Justice:
Debt Service and Related
Costs
General Fund Ch. 692 1(7) -$380,000
Oregon Military Department:
Capital Debt Service
and Related Costs
General Fund Ch. 594 1(5) -1,017
General Fund Ch. 837 96 -85,166
Other funds Ch. 594 2(5) +106,736
Oregon Youth Authority:
Capital Debt Service
and Related Costs
General Fund Ch. 837 98 -925,640
2016
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Corrections:
Debt Service
Other funds Ch. 82 47(4) +84,195
(7) TRANSPORTATION.
2015
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Transportation:
Debt Service on the State
Radio Project
Enrolled Senate Bill 5508 (SB 5508-A) Page 8
General Fund Ch. 761 2 -$528,900
SECTION 44. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 9, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 21, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5508 (SB 5508-A) Page 9